Illinois, session 104th, HB3419.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Rail carrier renewable diesel tax credit.8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92027, each taxpayer that manufactures renewable diesel in 10Illinois for use by a rail carrier is eligible for a credit 11against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 12201 as provided in this Section. 13    The amount of the credit shall be $1 per gallon, or 14fraction of a gallon, of renewable diesel that is manufactured 15by the taxpayer in the State for use by a rail carrier. 16    (b) To qualify for the credit under this Section, the 17taxpayer must retain in its books and records: 18        (1) records indicating the number of whole gallons of 19    renewable diesel manufactured by the taxpayer in Illinois 20    for use by a rail carrier; and 21        (2) a verification that the renewable diesel blended 22    by the taxpayer meets the definition of renewable diesel 23    set forth in this Section.   HB3419- 2 -LRB104 11395 HLH 21483 b1    The documentation must include detail sufficient for the 2Department to determine the number of gallons of renewable 3diesel manufactured in the State for use by rail carriers, as 4well as any other information reasonably required by the 5Department. 6    All documentation must be submitted to the Department in 7the form and manner required by the Department and by the date 8required by the Department. 9    (c) If the amount of the credit exceeds the taxpayer's tax 10liability for the taxable year, the excess may be carried 11forward and applied to the tax liability of the 10 taxable 12years following the excess credit year. The credit shall be 13applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 14liability. If there are credits from more than one tax year 15that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 16shall be applied first. In no event shall a credit under this 17Section reduce the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. 18    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 19250. 20    (e) As used in this Section: 21    "Renewable diesel" means diesel fuel that is a hydrocarbon 22fuel derived from biomass and that meets the requirements of 23the latest version of ASTM standards D975 or D396. 24    "Rail carrier" means a Class I railroad, a Class II 25railroad, or a Class III railroad, as defined in paragraph (1) 26of 49 U.S.C. 20102.    HB3419- 3 -LRB104 11395 HLH 21483 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.